Wyoming, session 2026, SF0008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-5-215 is created to read:
6-5-215. Absconding for criminal purposes; penalty.
(a) A person is guilty of absconding for criminal
purposes if the person travels from one (1) county to
another county in Wyoming or from one (1) county in Wyoming
to another jurisdiction outside of Wyoming:
(i) After having committed any criminal offense
under this title or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act
of 1971 and with the intent to evade or elude law
enforcement;
(ii) With the intent to commit an additional
criminal offense under this title or the Wyoming Controlled
Substances Act of 1971 after having committed an offense in
the original county; or
(iii) To dispose of or conceal the proceeds,
property or other items of value obtained after committing
any criminal offense under this title or the Wyoming
Controlled Substances Act of 1971.
(b) The penalty for absconding for criminal purposes
shall be the same as the penalty for the most serious crime
that was committed, was intended to be committed or
furthered as a result of the absconding for criminal
purposes.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0008
ENROLLED ACT NO. 8, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2